Maryland, session 2025, HB0743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
7.5–405.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “FUND” MEANS THE HEALTH CARE QUALITY FUND
FOR COMMUNITY–BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMS.
(B) THERE IS A HEALTH CARE QUALITY FUND FOR COMMUNITY–BASED
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMS IN THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PAY TO THE COMPTROLLER ALL CIVIL
PENALTIES COLLECTED FROM BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMS THAT ARE
ASSESSED BY THE ADMINISTRATION OR THE OFFICE OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY.
(2) THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE PENALTIES TO THE
FUND.
(D) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING FOR TRAINING,
GRANT AWARDS, DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS, OR OTHER PURPOSES DESIGNED TO
IMPROVE THE QUALITY OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE IN THE STATE.
(E) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(F) (1) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(2) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND SEPARATELY,
AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(G) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(1) CIVIL MONEY PENALTIES DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER
SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE FUND;
(3) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND

HOUSE BILL 743 3
(4) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED FOR
THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(H) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR TRAINING, GRANT AWARDS,
DEMONSTRATION PROJECTS, OR OTHER PURPOSES DESIGNED TO IMPROVE THE
QUALITY OF BEHAVIORAL HEALTH CARE.
(I) (1) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE FUND
IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(2) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE CREDITED TO
THE FUND.
(J) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(K) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS NOT
INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION OR THE OFFICE
OF HEALTH CARE QUALITY.
(L) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS FOR THE
DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS FROM THE HEALTH CARE QUALITY FUND FOR
COMMUNITY–BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMS.
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) 1. This subparagraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024
through 2028.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(ii) The provisions of subparagraph (i) of this paragraph do not apply
to the following funds:
204. the Victims of Domestic Violence Program Grant Fund;
[and]

HOUSE BILL 743
205. the Proposed Programs Collaborative Grant Fund; AND
206. THE HEALTH CARE QUALITY FUND FOR
COMMUNITY–BASED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAMS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.